Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3249.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; MISSISSIPPI RIVER CITIES AND TOWNS INITIATIVE.new text end new text begin $100,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to Explore Minnesota for costs associated with supporting the Mississippi River Cities and Towns Initiative (MRCTI) annual meeting in the Twin Cities region on September 16, 17, and 18 in 2025. The meeting will bring together mayors from cities along the ten-state main stem Mississippi River corridor to deliberate and enact critical interstate policies on disaster resilience, infrastructure, environmental restoration, and water security. The event will also attract federal and state partners, stakeholders, and embassies from across the world to advise on further essential best practices around watershed sustainability. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end